Hawaii statutes.
[§415A-29] Reservation of power. The
legislature shall at all times have power to prescribe such regulations,
provisions, and limitations as it may deem advisable, which regulations,
provisions, and limitations shall be binding upon any and all corporations
subject to this chapter, and the legislature shall have power to amend, repeal,
or modify this chapter at pleasure. [L 1985, c 259, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next